Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.080

Student athlete's right to cancel.

(1) A student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving notice in a record of cancellation to the athlete agent not later than fourteen days after the contract is signed.

(2) A student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

(3) If a student athlete, parent, or guardian cancels an agency contract, the athlete, parent, or guardian is not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete agent to influence the athlete to enter into the contract.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 8; 2002 c 131 s 9.]